Utah statutes.
16-7-13.   Merger and consolidation.
(1)  As long as the surviving corporation qualifies for tax exempt status
under Internal Revenue Code Section 501(c)(3), any corporation organized under
this chapter may merge with one or more domestic or foreign corporations
organized or authorized to do business in this state under this title, or with
one or more nonprofit domestic or foreign corporations organized or authorized
to do business in this state under this title.
(2) (a)  Articles of merger or consolidation shall be adopted by the
appropriate incorporator or the successor to an incorporator as described in
Section 16-7-2. If there is no such incorporator or successor, the articles
shall be signed by the officer or official authorized to administer the
affairs and property of the corporation according to the practices and
procedures of the church, denomination, or religious society.
(b)  The articles of merger or consolidation shall be adopted by any merging
or consolidating corporation organized under Title 16, Chapter 6a, Utah
Revised Nonprofit Corporation Act, as provided in Sections 16-6a-1101 and
16-6a-1102.
(3)  The effect of a merger or consolidation under this section is the same as
provided in Section 16-6a-1104.
